Washington statutes.
RCW 26.04.060

Marriage before unauthorized cleric—Effect.

A marriage solemnized before any person professing to be a minister or a priest, imam, rabbi, or similar official of any religious organization in this state or professing to be an authorized officer thereof, is not void, nor shall the validity thereof be in any way affected on account of any want of power or authority in such person, if such marriage be consummated with a belief on the part of the persons so married, or either of them, that they have been lawfully joined in marriage.

[ 2012 c 3 s 5 (Referendum Measure No. 74, approved November 6, 2012); 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 42 s 25; Code 1881 s 2388; 1866 p 83 ss 10 and 11; 1854 p 405 s 6; RRS s 8442. Formerly RCW 26.04.060 and 26.24.200.]

NOTES:

Notice—2012 c 3: See note following RCW 26.04.010.